Hawaii statutes.
[§328-114] Notice. Before any
violation of this part is reported for the institution of a criminal
proceeding, the person against whom the proceeding is contemplated shall be
given appropriate notice and an opportunity to present the person's views before
the department either orally or in writing, in person or by an attorney, with
regard to the contemplated proceeding. [L 1992, c 196, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next